Massachusetts, session 194th, H3664.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall create and administer an 18-month
pilot program allowing for the in-person payment of daily parking fees without the use of a
mobile telephone at the parking lots owned and operated by the authority at the Canton Junction,
Canton Center and Stoughton commuter rail stations. To administer the program, the authority
shall install and maintain for at least 18 months, at each location, 2 automated payment machines
that allow customers to make in-person payment for daily parking fees by cash or credit card
without the use of a mobile telephone or any other portable electronic device.
The Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall file a report on the efficacy of the
pilot program with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives and the house and senate
of 2

chairs of the joint committee on transportation. The report shall include an estimate of the
percentage of parking fees collected at each location under the pilot program and make
recommendations, if any, for the need to install and maintain similar automated payment
machines at other parking lots owned and operated by the authority. The report shall be filed no
sooner than 12 months after initiation of the pilot program but not later than 18 months after
initiation.
of 2